Missouri, session 2026, HB2869.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 137, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 137.1052, to read as follows:
137.1052. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Missouri
Disabled Veteran Homestead Tax Credit Act".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "County", any county or city not within a county in this state;
(2) "CPI", the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers, as defined and
officially recorded by the United States Department of Labor or its successor;
(3) "Disability rating", the percentage of disability assigned to a disabled
veteran by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, reflecting the degree to
which the veteran's disability impacts the veteran's ability to work and perform daily
activities;
(4) "Disabled veteran", a Missouri resident who has been separated under
honorable conditions from active service in any branch or reserve component of the
Armed Forces of the United States or the National Guard of a state as defined in 32
U.S.C. Section 101, as amended, and has a service-connected disability and has received
a disability rating of one hundred percent permanent and total as certified by the United
States Department of Veterans Affairs;
(5) "Eligible owner", an individual who is a disabled veteran, is the owner of
record of the qualified residence or has a legal or equitable interest in a qualified
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 2869 2
residence as evidenced by a written instrument, and is liable for the payment of real
property taxes on the qualified residence;
(6) "Homestead", the residential real property that is used as a primary
residence and the adjacent real property as is reasonably necessary for use of the
residence as a home dwelling;
(7) "Primary residence", the real property owned and occupied by an eligible
owner as the principal place of residence, and not to exceed five acres of land
surrounding it as is reasonably necessary for use of the dwelling as a home;
(8) "Qualified amount", for any eligible owner in a given tax year, the total
amount of real property taxes levied and imposed on the qualified residence and shall
include all ad valorem taxes levied on the qualified residence by any county or other
political subdivision including, but not limited to, county levies, municipal levies, school
district levies including bonded indebtedness levies, fire protection district levies, library
district levies, and any other local ad valorem levy authorized by law, but shall exclude
the levy imposed for the state blind pension fund;
(9) "Qualified residence", the homestead of an eligible owner that has an
assessed value not to exceed five hundred thousand dollars, but less any portion of that
property that is used for commercial purposes. If the property, or a portion of the
property, is rented out to another person for more than six months, it is presumed to be
used for commercial purposes. The five-hundred-thousand-dollar limit shall be
increased annually per calendar year for inflation by an amount equal to the percentage
change in the annual average of the CPI, or zero, whichever is greater. No more than
one property per qualified owner per tax year shall be claimed as a qualified residence
under this section;
(10) "Real property tax credit", a credit against an eligible owner's liability for
tax on the qualified residence that is levied and imposed by the governing body of a
county or other political subdivision of this state with the power to levy and impose taxes
on real property in this state.
3. (1) As allowed by the authority granted under Article X, Section 6(a) of the
Constitution of Missouri, for all tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2027, a
county may grant an annual real property tax credit, as calculated in this subsection, for
the qualified residence of an eligible owner if such county adopts an order, ordinance, or
resolution authorizing such real property tax credit in such county.
(2) The qualified amount of a real property tax credit provided under this
section shall be equal to the percentage of the tax credit as adopted by the county under
this section.

HCS HB 2869 3
(3) A county may grant a tax credit under this section for any percentage of the
qualified amount that does not exceed one hundred percent of the eligible owner's
liability for tax on the qualified residence under this section. Such percentage shall be
stated in any vote taken by the governing body of the county under subsection 8 of this
section. Before January first of any year, the governing body of such county may, by
ordinance, adjust the percentage of the tax credit for the next year of general
reassessment.
(4) If the total assessed value of the dwelling and surrounding acreage does not
exceed five hundred thousand dollars, ownership of additional acreage shall not
disqualify an owner from eligibility under the provisions of this section.
4. The real property tax credit under this section carries over to the benefit of
the eligible owner's surviving spouse as long as the spouse holds the legal or beneficial
title to the qualified residence, permanently resides therein, and does not remarry. No
real property tax credit shall be allowed for the tax year in which the surviving spouse
remarries, no longer holds legal or beneficial title, or relocates to a different primary
residence.
5. Real property tax credits issued under the provisions of this section shall not
be refundable. No real property tax credit claimed under this section shall be carried
forward to any subsequent tax year. The real property tax credit allowed under this
section shall not be transferred, assigned, sold, or otherwise conveyed, except as
provided under this section.
6. Real property tax credits authorized under the provisions of this section shall
not reduce assessed valuation and shall not be construed as an exemption from real
property taxes. The security for any bonded indebtedness based on assessed valuation
shall remain intact.
7. An eligible owner who receives a real property tax credit granted under this
section shall not be eligible for any other real property tax relief, the property tax
credits under sections 135.010 to 135.035, or any other tax credits relating to the eligible
owner's qualified residence under this chapter or chapter 135.
8. Participation in the program under this section is optional as follows:
(1) Any county may, by a majority affirmative vote of the governing body of
such county, opt in to the provisions of this section for the next year of the general
reassessment, prior to January first of any year;
(2) If the county opts in to the provisions of this section, participation in this
program for an eligible owner is also optional. An eligible owner electing to participate
in the provisions under this section may opt in by notifying the local collector's office or
other entity of such election to request a real property tax credit; and

HCS HB 2869 4
(3) The governing body of the county may, by a majority affirmative vote, opt to
rescind and cease the real property tax credit program authorized under this section
and previously adopted by the governing body, for the next year of the general
reassessment, prior to January first of any year. Any rescission shall be prospective only
and shall affect real property tax credits previously applied.
9. The governing body of the county may adopt reasonable procedures and
promulgate ordinances, rules, and regulations in order to implement and administer the
provisions of this section.
100 10. The assessor's office, collector's office, or other entity designated by rule,
101 regulation, or ordinance shall administer the real property tax credit allowed under this
102 section in the same manner as the tax credit authorized under section 137.1050 and shall
103 be subject to similar application, verification, and renewal procedures as adopted by
104 such county, if applicable. Eligibility determinations shall be made in accordance with
105 guidelines established by this section and any additional local rules or regulations.
106 11. For the purposes of calculating property tax levies under section 137.073, and
107 for all other laws prescribing the distribution or allocation of property tax revenues, the
108 total amount of real property tax credits authorized under this section shall be
109 considered tax revenue actually received by the county or other political subdivision.
110 12. A real property tax credit granted under this section shall not affect the
111 process of setting the tax rate as required under Article X, Section 22 of the Constitution
112 of Missouri and section 137.073 in any prior, current, or subsequent tax year.
113 13. Nothing in this section shall impair the obligation of any contract, reduce or
114 restrict the taxing authority of any political subdivision, or alter the calculation of
115 assessed valuation for the purposes of bonded indebtedness.
✔